Maryland, session 2026, HB0652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–105.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0652*

HOUSE BILL 652
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(7) “FIRST–TIME HOMEBUYER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A
RESIDENT OF THE STATE AND WHO HAS NOT HAD A LEGAL INTEREST, INDIVIDUALLY
OR OTHERWISE, IN A DWELLING IN ANY STATE.
[(7)] (8) “Homeowner” means an individual who has a legal interest in a
dwelling or who is an active member of an agricultural ownership entity that has a legal
interest in a dwelling.
[(8)] (9) “Legal interest” means an interest in a dwelling:
(i) as a sole owner;
(ii) as a joint tenant;
(iii) as a tenant in common;
(iv) as a tenant by the entireties;
(v) through membership in a cooperative;
(vi) under a land installment contract, as defined in § 10–101 of the
Real Property Article;
(vii) as a holder of a life estate; or
(viii) as a settlor, grantor, or beneficiary of a trust if:
1. the settlor, grantor, or beneficiary of the trust does not pay
rent or other remuneration to reside in the dwelling; and
2. legal title to the dwelling is held in the name of the trust
or in the names of the trustees for the trust.
[(9)] (10) (I) [“Taxable] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH
(II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, “TAXABLE assessment” means the assessment on which the
property tax rate was imposed in the preceding taxable year, adjusted by the phased–in
assessment increase resulting from a revaluation under § 8–104(c)(1)(iii) of this article, less
the amount of any assessment on which a property tax credit under this section is
authorized.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (D)(1)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, FOR THE FIRST TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH A FIRST–TIME HOMEBUYER
OWES PROPERTY TAXES ON A DWELLING, “TAXABLE ASSESSMENT” MEANS THE

HOUSE BILL 652 3
ASSESSMENT ON WHICH THE PROPERTY TAX RATE WAS IMPOSED IN THE PRECEDING
TAXABLE YEAR FOR THE PREVIOUS OWNER, ADJUSTED BY THE PHASED–IN
ASSESSMENT INCREASE RESULTING FROM A REVALUATION UNDER §
8–104(C)(1)(III) OF THIS ARTICLE, LESS THE AMOUNT OF ANY ASSESSMENT ON
WHICH A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED.
(b) (1) If there is an increase in property assessment as calculated under this
section, the State and the governing body of each county and of each municipal corporation
shall grant a property tax credit under this section against the State, county, and municipal
corporation property tax imposed on real property by the State, county, or municipal
corporation.
(2) A property tax credit granted under this section shall be applicable to
any State, county, or municipal corporation property tax and any property tax imposed for
a bicounty commission.
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (6) of this subsection AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (9) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the Department shall
authorize and the State, a county, or a municipal corporation shall grant a property tax
credit under this section for a taxable year unless during the previous taxable year:
(i) the dwelling was transferred for consideration to new ownership;
(ii) the value of the dwelling was increased due to a change in the
zoning classification of the dwelling initiated or requested by the homeowner or anyone
having an interest in the property;
(iii) the use of the dwelling was changed substantially; or
(iv) the assessment of the dwelling was clearly erroneous due to an
error in calculation or measurement of improvements on the real property.
(9) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTHORIZE AND THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION SHALL GRANT A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION TO A
FIRST–TIME HOMEBUYER BEGINNING WITH THE FIRST TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE
FIRST–TIME HOMEBUYER HAS A LEGAL INTEREST IN THE DWELLING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–305.

HOUSE BILL 652
(e) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the governing body
of Baltimore County may grant, by law, a property tax credit against the county property
tax imposed on residential real property that is:
(iii) used as the principal residence of a homeowner as defined in [§
9–105(a)(7)] § 9–105 of this title; and
14–801.
(c) “Owner–occupied residential property” means, with respect to a property
located in Baltimore City, the principal residence of a homeowner as defined in [§
9–105(a)(7)] § 9–105 of this article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and Section 1 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
June 30, 2026.